Vermont, session 2025-2026, H268.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. chapter 42 is added to read:
CHAPTER 42. TOWING OF MOTOR VEHICLES
§ 4251. SHORT TITLE
This chapter may be cited as the “Vermont Consumer Protection Towing
Act.”
§ 4252. PURPOSE
The purpose of the Vermont Consumer Protection Towing Act is to
establish minimum standards for towing and storage services and to promote
fair and honest practices in the towing industry.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 2 of 19
§ 4253. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Automobile club” means a legal entity that, in consideration of
dues, assessments, or periodic payments of money, promises its members or
subscribers to assist them in matters relating to motor travel or the operation,
use, or maintenance of a motor vehicle, including auto dealers and insurance
companies, by supplying services, which may include towing service,
emergency road service, and indemnification service.
(2) “Dealer” has the same meaning as in subdivision 4(8) of this title.
(3) “Drop fee” means a charge offered instead of a standard tow fee that
allows an owner or operator who arrives on scene prior to a vehicle being
towed to stop a tow that is in process.
(4) “Emergency towing” means the towing of a vehicle due to a motor
vehicle crash, mechanical breakdown on a public highway, or other
emergency-related incident necessitating vehicle removal for public safety
with or without the owner’s or operator’s consent.
(5) “Government agency towing” means the towing of government-
owned or government-controlled vehicles by the government agency that owns
or controls them.
(6) “Owner” means the person to whom a vehicle is registered or to
whom it is leased, if the terms of the lease require the lessee to maintain and
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 3 of 19
repair the vehicle. For the purposes of this chapter, a rental vehicle company is
the owner of a vehicle rented pursuant to a rental agreement.
(7) “Private property towing” means the towing of a vehicle, without the
owner’s or operator’s consent, from private property where it was illegally
parked, or for which some exigent circumstance necessitated its removal, to a
nearby location.
(8) “Rental vehicle company” means any person, including a franchisee,
in the business of renting vehicles to the public.
(9) “Seizure towing” means the taking of a vehicle for law enforcement
purposes, such as the maintenance of the chain of custody of evidence,
forfeiture of assets, or unpaid parking tickets.
(10) “Storage services” means storing a towed vehicle at a towing-
storage lot.
(11) “Tow truck” means a motor vehicle equipped to tow or pick up
vehicles, including damaged or disabled vehicles.
(12) “Towing company” means any corporation, association, sole-
proprietorship, co-partnership, company, firm, or other aggregation of
individuals that exists to provide towing or storage services. A towing
company does not include an automobile club, dealer, or insurance company.
(13) “Towing or storage services” means towing services or storage
services, or both.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 4 of 19
(14) “Towing services” means towing or otherwise moving vehicles by
means of a tow truck.
(15) “Towing-storage lot” means a property used to store vehicles that
have been towed.
§ 4254. APPLICABILITY; RULEMAKING; COMPLAINTS
(a) Applicability.
(1) This chapter shall apply to any person engaging in, or offering to
engage in, the business of providing towing or storage services in Vermont.
This chapter shall not apply to vehicles towed into Vermont or towed through
Vermont, provided that the tow originates in another jurisdiction.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, this chapter shall
not apply to towing and storage services by an automobile club, dealer, or
insurance company or the towing of an abandoned motor vehicle as defined in
section 2151 of this title.
(b) Regulatory authority. This chapter confers exclusive regulatory
jurisdiction over towing companies and the provision of towing and storage
services to the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(c) Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 for the administration of this chapter, including the assessment of
administrative penalties in addition to those penalties allowed under section
4266 of this chapter.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 5 of 19
(d) Complaints. The Department shall establish a complaint mechanism
for consumers and insurers.
§ 4255. EMERGENCY TOWING
(a) Prohibitions. It is a misdemeanor for a towing company to stop or
cause an individual to stop at the scene of a crash or near a disabled vehicle for
the purpose of soliciting an engagement for emergency towing services, either
directly or indirectly, or, unless requested to perform the services by a law
enforcement officer or public agency pursuant to that agency’s procedures or
unless summoned to the scene or requested to stop by the owner or operator of
a disabled vehicle, to provide towing emergency towing services, to move a
vehicle from a highway when there is an injury as the result of a crash, or to
accrue charges for services provided under those circumstances.
(b) Selection of towing company.
(1) The owner or operator of the vehicle being towed shall summon to
the scene the towing company of the owner’s or operator’s choice in
consultation with law enforcement or authorized municipal personnel and
designate the location where the vehicle is to be towed.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply
when the owner or operator is incapacitated, otherwise unable to summon a
tow company, or defers to law enforcement or authorized municipal personnel.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 6 of 19
(3) The authority provided to the owner or operator in subdivision (1) of
this subsection may be superseded by the law enforcement officer or
authorized municipal personnel if the towing company of choice cannot
respond to the scene in a timely fashion and the vehicle is a hazard, impedes
the flow of traffic, or may not legally remain in its location in the opinion of
the law enforcement officer or authorized municipal personnel.
(c) Record of caller.
(1) If a towing company is summoned for an emergency tow by the
owner or operator of a disabled vehicle, the towing company shall record the
first name, last name, and telephone number of the individual who summoned
it to the scene and the make, model, year, color, vehicle identification number
(VIN), and license plate number of the towed vehicle.
(2) If a towing company is summoned for an emergency tow by a law
enforcement officer or designee of a public safety agency with jurisdiction, the
towing company shall record the identity of the law enforcement officer or
designee of a public safety agency with jurisdiction and the log number, call
number, incident number, or dispatch number assigned to the incident as
applicable.
(d) Visual documentation. Prior to towing a vehicle under this section, a
towing company shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation
to evidence the location of the vehicle and any damages.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 7 of 19
(e) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain a record of the information
described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and shall retain that
information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(f) Storage. The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles
and make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicle’s cargo and contents.
§ 4256. PRIVATE PROPERTY TOWING REQUIREMENTS
(a) Establishment of a private tow-away zone. The owner of private
property may establish a private tow-away zone by posting a sign that is at
least 18 inches by 24 inches in size and includes a statement that the property
is a tow-away zone, a description of persons authorized to park on the
property, and the address and telephone number for where towed vehicles are
stored.
(b) Prohibition and record of caller. A towing company shall not tow a
vehicle under this section unless it receives a request for a tow. The towing
company shall record the date, time, and name of the requestor.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 8 of 19
(c) Visual documentation. Prior to towing a vehicle under this section, a
towing company shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation
to evidence that the vehicle is clearly parked on private property in violation of
a private tow-away zone. The towing company shall record the time and date
of the photographs, video, or other visual documentation.
(d) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain a record of the information
described in subsections (b) and (c) of this section and shall retain that
information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(e) Location and storage.
(1) A towing company shall ensure that a vehicle towed under this
section is taken to a location that is within 25 miles of the location of the
private tow-away zone.
(2) The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles and
make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicle’s cargo and contents.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 9 of 19
(f) Release of vehicle prior to towing. If the owner or operator of a vehicle
is parked in violation of a private tow-away zone and arrives while the vehicle
is being removed, the towing company shall give the vehicle owner or operator
oral or written notification that the vehicle owner or operator may pay a drop
fee for the release of the vehicle. Upon payment of that fee, the towing
company shall release the vehicle and give the vehicle owner or operator a
receipt showing both the full amount normally assessed and the actual amount
received.
(g) Notice. The towing company shall provide notice of the tow to law
enforcement within two hours after removing the vehicle from the private tow-
away zone.
§ 4257. SEIZURE TOWING
(a) Location and storage.
(1) A towing company shall ensure that a vehicle towed under this
section is taken to a location that is within 25 miles of the location where the
vehicle is towed from.
(2) The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles and
make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicle’s cargo and contents.
(b) Release of vehicle prior to towing. If the owner or operator of a vehicle
that is being towed because of unpaid parking tickets arrives while the vehicle
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 10 of 19
is being towed, the towing company shall give the vehicle owner or operator
oral or written notification that the vehicle owner or operator may pay a drop
fee for the release of the vehicle. Upon payment of that fee, the towing
company shall release the vehicle and give the vehicle owner or operator a
receipt showing both the full amount normally assessed and the actual amount
received.
§ 4258. ESTIMATE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Estimate required. If the owner or operator of a vehicle is present at the
time and location of a tow, the towing company shall furnish the owner or
operator of the vehicle with a written itemized estimate of all charges and
services to be performed.
(b) Estimate contents. The estimate required under subsection (a) of this
section shall include all of the following:
(1) the name, address, telephone number, and motor carrier permit
number of the towing company;
(2) the license plate number of the tow truck performing the tow; and
(3) an itemized description and cost for all services, including charges
for labor, special equipment, mileage from dispatch to return, and storage fees
expressed as a daily rate.
(c) Signature required.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 11 of 19
(1) The towing company shall obtain the vehicle owner’s or operator’s
written or electronic signature on the itemized estimate and shall furnish a
copy to the individual who signs the estimate.
(2) The requirements in subdivision (1) of this subsection may be
completed after the vehicle is attached and removed to the nearest safe
shoulder or highway if done at the request of law enforcement or a public
agency, provided the estimate is furnished prior to the removal of the vehicle
from the nearest safe shoulder or highway.
(d) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain the records required under
subsection (a) of this section and shall retain that information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
§ 4259. INVOICE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Invoice required. All services rendered by a towing company,
including any warranty or zero-cost services, shall be recorded on an invoice.
Each additional service must be set forth individually as a single line item with
an explanation and the exact charge for the service.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 12 of 19
(b) Invoice contents. Each itemized invoice for towing costs shall contain
the following:
(1) the location from which the vehicle was towed;
(2) the storage location of the vehicle;
(3) the name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;
(4) a description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year, color,
vehicle identification number (VIN), and license plate number of the towed
vehicle;
(5) the charge for the tow; and
(6) the daily storage charge and the number of days the vehicle was
stored.
(c) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain the records required under
subsection (a) of this section and shall retain that information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
§ 4260. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Notice required. Within 24 hours after the commencement of towing,
the towing company must commence a search of the records of the Department
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 13 of 19
of Motor Vehicles to ascertain the identity of the owner and any lienholder of
the towed vehicle. Written notice shall be given directly to the owner by
registered mail within five business days after the commencement of towing,
and no storage charges beyond the initial 24-hour charge shall accrue until the
notice requirement has been met.
(b) Notice contents. Notice to the owner or insurer shall contain the
following:
(1) the name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;
(2) the date and time the vehicle was towed;
(3) the location from which the vehicle was towed;
(4) the address where the vehicle is or will be stored and the address and
telephone number where payment and business transactions take place if either
is different from the address and telephone number of the towing company;
(5) the name of the tow truck operator; and
(6) a description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year, color,
vehicle identification number (VIN), and license plate number of the towed
vehicle.
§ 4261. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS; INSURANCE; DISPLAY
(a) Application.
(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall approve an application for a
towing company license or renewal and issue or renew the license, provided
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 14 of 19
the applicant submits an approvable application on a form prescribed by the
Department of Motor Vehicles and pays a $50.00 application fee.
(2) An application shall include:
(A) the applicant’s workers’ compensation coverage;
(B) a certification that the applicant is current and in good standing
with the Department of Labor’s Unemployment Insurance Program;
(C) the financial responsibility of an applicant relating to liability
insurance or bond requirements;
(D) the applicant’s standard hours of operation;
(E) the applicant’s after-hours access policy;
(F) the applicant’s business address and contact information;
(G) the applicant’s towing and storage charges; and
(H) any other information the Department of Motor Vehicles may
require.
(3) The applicant must not have been convicted of fraud or had a civil
judgment rendered against it for fraud. In addition, each officer, director, or
partner of an applicant that is a corporation or partnership must not have been
convicted of fraud or had a civil judgment rendered against the individual for
fraud during the officer’s, director’s, or partner’s tenure.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 15 of 19
(b) Insurance.
(1) The applicant must provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of the following or a sufficient surety bond as determined by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles:
(A) $100,000.00 for liability for bodily injury or property damage per
occurrence; and
(B) $50,000.00 of legal liability per occurrence, to protect against
vehicle damage, including fire and theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the
custody of a towing company until it is redeemed or sold.
(2) Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by
subdivision (1) of this subsection automatically revokes the applicant’s license.
(c) Display. A towing company granted a license or renewal under this
section shall prominently display the license, hours of operation, and charges
for towing and storage at the towing company’s primary place of business and
website, if one is maintained.
(d) Licenses are nonassignable and nontransferable. Licenses shall be
nonassignable and nontransferable and shall be surrendered to the Department
of Motor Vehicles immediately upon the towing company ceasing to do
business as a towing company.
§ 4262. MAXIMUM CHARGES
(a) A towing company shall not charge more than the following rates:
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 16 of 19
(1) $130.00 per tow or $4.50 per mile towed;
(2) $30.00 per drop fee;
(3) $35.00 per day of storage for any day that the towing company is
operating under its standard hours of operation; and
(4) $35.00 for access to a towed vehicle for the recovery of personal
items outside the towing company’s standard hours of operation.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, charges for towing an
abandoned vehicle from public property shall be in accordance with section
2158 of this title and fees for towing or storing a vehicle pursuant to municipal
ordinance shall be as established by the municipality in accordance with
section 1753 of this title.
(c) No charge shall be made in excess of the estimated price without the
prior consent of the owner or operator of the vehicle.
§ 4263. HOURS OF OPERATION
A towing-storage lot shall have, at a minimum, the following standard hours
of operation: 7:00 a.m.–6:00 p.m. Monday–Friday, exclusive of federal and
State holidays, and on at least one weekend day.
§ 4264. RELEASE OF VEHICLE; METHODS OF PAYMENT
(a) A towing company shall release a towed vehicle to the owner or the
insurance company representative upon receipt of payment.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 17 of 19
(b) A towing company shall only release a towed vehicle to the insurance
company representative if:
(1) the owner’s insurance company representative presents proof that the
towed vehicle is insured with the company; or
(2) the owner of the towed vehicle approves release of the towed vehicle
to the insurance company representative.
(c) The owner of the towed vehicle or the owner of the towed vehicle’s
insurance company representative shall have the right to inspect the vehicle
before accepting its return.
(d) A towing company shall accept, at a minimum, cash, an insurance
check, a credit card, a debit card, a certified check, or a money order.
§ 4265. PROHIBITED ACTS
(a) It shall be unlawful for a towing company or an individual acting on
behalf of a towing company to:
(1) falsely represent, either expressly or by implication, that the towing
company represents or is approved by any private organization that provides
emergency road service for disabled motor vehicles;
(2) require an owner or operator of a motor vehicle involved in a crash
or breakdown to preauthorize one or more of the following: more than 24
hours of storage, tear down, or repair work as a condition to providing towing
services for the vehicle;
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 18 of 19
(3) charge more than one towing fee when the owner or operator of a
disabled vehicle requests transport of the vehicle to a repair facility owned or
operated by the towing company;
(4) operate a towing company or offer towing or storage services
without being a towing company licensed by the Department of Motor
Vehicles;
(5) charge more than the maximum fees as allowed under section 4262
of this chapter;
(6) submit false or fraudulent information to obtain a towing license; or
(7) violate any other provision of this chapter.
(b) Towing companies shall not tow disabled vehicles to a repair facility
unless the owner or operator of the disabled vehicle gives written consent
before removal of the disabled vehicle.
(c) No towing company shall refuse to release a vehicle to the owner or the
owner’s insurer upon tender of full payment of an itemized invoice for all
lawful charges made in connection with the towing and storage of a vehicle.
(d) No towing company shall refuse, including prior to payment of fees and
release of a towed vehicle, the right of physical inspection of the towed vehicle
by the owner or the owner’s insurer or the recovery of personal items left in the
vehicle during the towing company’s standard hours of operation.
VT LEG #379117 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.268
2025 Page 19 of 19
(e) No towing company shall charge storage for any day where release of
the towed vehicle or access to the towed vehicle by the owner or insurer is not
permitted by the towing company.
§ 4266. PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall have authority for the
inspection of all locations operated by a towing company.
(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall investigate any suspected
violations and complaints that are filed with the Department and take all proper
and necessary remedial action.
(c) Any towing company that submits false or fraudulent information to
obtain a towing license shall have its license revoked.
Sec. 2. RULEMAKING
Unless extended by the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 843(c), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt
rules required under 23 V.S.A. § 4254(c), as added by Sec. 1 of this act, not
later than June 1, 2026, to be effective July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379117 v.2